Hawaii statutes.
§841-6 Subpoenas; penalty for failure to
comply. [(a)] The coroner or any deputy coroner may issue subpoenas for
the attendance of any witnesses that the coroner or any deputy coroner may deem
necessary to interrogate in the death then under investigation, returnable
forthwith or at such place and time as the coroner or any deputy coroner shall
therein direct.

[(b)] Any person who fails to comply with the
requirements of such a subpoena upon conviction before any district court
having jurisdiction in the matter, shall be fined not more than $25. [L 1935, c
90, §6; RL 1945, §10906; RL 1955, §260-6; HRS §715-6; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of
§1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next